Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Chapter 5 Trust Companies

Cross references. —

For Uniform Fiduciaries Act, see §

2-3-201

et seq.

For Uniform Common Trust Fund Act, see §

2-3-401

et seq.

For Uniform Trustees' Powers Act, see chapter 8 of title 4.

Out-of-state trust companies not under supervision of commissioner. —

Trust companies organized under the laws of another state are not under the supervision of, nor subject to examination by, the state examiner (now commissioner), as are trust companies organized under the laws of this state. Gaudina v. Haberman, 644 P.2d 159,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks and Financial Institutions §§ 689 to 704; 76 Am. Jur. 2d Trusts § 1 et seq.

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 625 to 646.